Utah statutes.
76-10-907.   Records of sales and purchases -- Identification required.
(1)  Every dealer shall:
(a)  require the information under Subsection (2) for each transaction of
regulated metal, except under Subsection 76-10-907.3(4); and
(b)  maintain for each purchase of regulated metal the information required by
this part in a written or electronic log, in the English language.
(2)  The dealer shall require the following information of the seller and
shall record the information as required under Subsection (1) for each
purchase of regulated metal:
(a)  a complete description of the regulated metal, including weight and
metallic description, in accordance with scrap metal recycling industry
standards;
(b)  the full name and residence of each person selling the regulated metal;
(c)  the vehicle type and license plate number, if applicable, of the vehicle
transporting the regulated metal to the dealer;
(d)  the price per pound and the amount paid for each type of regulated metal
purchased by the dealer;
(e)  the date, time, and place of the purchase;
(f)  the type and number of the identification provided in Subsection (2)(g);
(g)  at least one form of identification;
(h)  the seller's signature on a certificate stating that he has the legal
right to sell the scrap metal or junk; and
(i)  a digital photograph or still video of the seller, taken at the time of
the sale, or a clearly legible photocopy of the seller's identification.
(3)  No entry in the log may be erased, deleted, mutilated, or changed.
(4)  The log and entries shall be open to inspection by the following
officials having jurisdiction over the area in which the dealer does business
during regular business hours:
(a)  the county sheriff or deputies;
(b)  any law enforcement agency; and
(c)  any constable or other state, municipal, or county  official in the
county in which the dealer does business.
(5)  A dealer shall make these records available for inspection by any law
enforcement agency, upon request, at the dealer's place of business during the
dealer's regular business hours.
(6)  Log entries made under this section shall be maintained for not less than
one year from date of entry.
(7)  The dealer may maintain the information required by Subsection (2) for
repeat sellers who use the same vehicle to bring regulated metal for each
transaction in a relational database that allows the dealer to enter an
initial record of the seller's information and then relate subsequent
transaction records to that initial information.
(8)  This section does not apply to a single purchase of regulated metal by a
dealer if:
(a)  the weight of regulated metal is less than 50 pounds; and
(b)  the price paid to the seller is less than $100.
